Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1084.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-24-54 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-24 entitled "Zoning
Ordinances" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-24-54. Administration — Administration and enforcement of zoning ordinance.
(a) A zoning ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter must provide for the administration
and enforcement of its provisions pursuant to this chapter. The zoning ordinance must designate
the local official or agency and specify minimum qualifications for the person or persons charged
with its administration and enforcement, including: (1) the issuing of any required permits or
certificates; (2) collection of required fees; (3) keeping of records showing the compliance of uses
of land; (4) authorizing commencement of uses or development under the provisions of the zoning
ordinance; (5) inspection of suspected violations; (6) issuance of violation notices with required
correction action; (7) collection of fines for violations; and (8) upon written request, issue a zoning
certificate or provide information to the requesting party as to the determination by the official or
agency; and (9) performing any other duties and taking any actions that may be assigned in the
ordinance. In order to provide guidance or clarification, the zoning enforcement officer or agency
shall, upon written request, issue a zoning certificate or provide information to the requesting party
as to the determination by the official or agency A zoning certificate shall be issued within fifteen
(15) twenty (20) days of the written request. In the event that no written response is provided within
that time, the requesting party has the right to appeal to the zoning board of review for the
determination pursuant to § 45-24-63.

(b) The requesting party has the right to appeal the determination made in the zoning
certificate pursuant to § 45-24-63.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002879/SUB A/2
========
LC002879/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 3